src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/cy-cy-g1.utb
largesign \x0174 4-2456 lower w circumflex
largesign \x0175 4-2456 upper w circumflex

largesign \x0176 4-13456 upper y circumflex
largesign \x0177 4-13456 lower y circumflex

largesign \x0178 45-13456 upper y with dieresis
largesign \x00FF 45-13456 lower y with dieresis

largesign \x1EF2 23-13456 upper y with grave
largesign \x1EF3 23-13456 lower y with grave

hyphen 	\x2010 36		 # 8208			hyphen

# punctuation \x2011 36		 # 8209			non-breaking hyphen
punctuation \x2011 23478	# 8209  non-breaking hyphen


always	\x2013 56-36		 # 8211		smart minus sign


noback always	\x201C 236	 # 8220			smart opening double quote
noback always	\x201D 356	 # 8221			smart closing double quote
noback always	\x201E 236	 # 8222			smart double low quotation mark
noback always	\x201F 356	 # 8223			smart double high reverse quotation mark


# mathematical symbols
decpoint . 2
noback always < 246
joinword = 56-2356
joinnum = 56-2356
noback always > 135
midnum + 0-56-235-3456
joinnum + 56-235
joinword + 56-235
midnum - 36-3456
noback always - 36
joinnum × 56-236
joinword × 56-236
midnum ÷ 0-56-256-3456 division sign
joinnum ÷ 56-256
joinword ÷ 56-256
begnum £ 123
always £ 4-123 pounds

# other special characters
always © 45-14 copyright
sign ™ 45-2345 trademark
sign ® 45-1235 registered
always ¶ 1234-345 paragraph
always § 234-3 section
noback always ° 356 degrees
begnum $ 256
always $ 4-256
always ¢ 4-14 cents
sign € 4-15	euro
always € 4-15	euro
always ¥ 4-13456 yen
always µ 2-134 mu

# special character sequences
literal :// URLs
literal www.

literal .com
literal .edu
literal .gov
literal .mil
literal .net
literal .org
include countries.cti

literal .doc
literal .htm
literal .html
literal .tex
literal .txt

literal .gif
literal .jpg
literal .png
literal .wav

literal .tar
literal .zip
